Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 3. Child Support Guidelines

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 51, § 1, and ch. 225, § 1, both enacted an article 3. The provisions enacted by Laws 1989, ch. 51, were renumbered as article 4.

Laws 1990, ch. 60, § 3, repealed Laws 1989, ch. 225, § 2, which had repealed this article effective July 1, 1990. Most of the provisions were subsequently renumbered by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 20-6-301.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-2-303

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 20-6-302.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-2-307

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 20-6-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 225, § 1, related to apportionment of support.

§ 20-6-304.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-2-304

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 20-6-305.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-2-306

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.

§ 20-6-306.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

20-2-311

by Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2.